lt-LT: Lūpų blizgesio formuluotė: Balzamo ir blizgesio hibridas; Kreminis; Blizgus; Želė; Lakas; Skystis; Aliejus; Didinantis; Lazdelė; Atspalvis; Kita
nl: Lipglossformulering: Balsem-gloss hybride; Crème; Glans; Jelly; Lak; Vloeistof; Olie; Plumper; Stick; Tint; Andere
hu: Szájfény összetétele: Balzsam-szájfény hibrid; Krém; Fényes; Zselé; Lakk; Folyadék; Olaj; Dúsító; Rúd; Színező; Egyéb
ko: 립글로스 제형: 밤-글로스 하이브리드; 크림; 글로스; 젤리; 래커; 액상; 오일; 플럼퍼; 막대; 틴트; 기타
tr: Dudak parlatıcı formülasyonu: Balm-gloss karışımı; Krem; Parlak; Jöle; Lake; Sıvı; Yağ; Dolgunlaştırıcı; Sap; Tint; Diğer
fi: Huulikiillon koostumus: Balsami-kiilto-hybridi; Kreem; Kiiltävä; Hyytelö; Lakka; Nestemäinen; Öljyväri; Täyteläistäjä; Tikku; Sävyte; Muu
ro-RO: Formulă de luciu de buze: Hibrid balsam-gloss; Cremă; Lucios; Jeleu; Lac; Lichid; Ulei; Volumizator; Baton; Tentă; Altele
ja: リップグロス配合: バーム・グロスハイブリッド; クレーム; グロス; ジェリー; ラッカー; リキッド; オイルペイント; プランパー; スティック; ティント; その他
pt-BR: Formulação do gloss labial: Híbrido bálsamo-gloss; Creme; Gloss; Gelatina; Laca; Líquido; Óleo; Volumizador; Vareta; Tint; Outro
es: Formulación de brillo labial: Híbrido bálsamo-brillo; Crema; Brillo; Gelatina; Laca; Líquido; Aceite; Voluminizador; Palillo; Tinte; Otros
bg-BG: Формула на гланца за устни: Хибрид балсам-гланц; Крем; Гланц; Желе; Лак; Течност; Масло; Плъмпър; Стик; Тинт; Други
hr-HR: Formulacija sjajila za usne: Hibrid balzama i sjajila; Krema; Sjajni; Žele; Lak; Tekućina; Ulje; Povećivač; Stik; Tint; Ostalo
zh-TW: 唇彩配方: 護唇唇蜜混合; 乳霜狀; 亮彩唇蜜; 果凍狀; 漆; 液態; 油; 豐唇; 棒狀; 染唇液; 其他
ru: Состав блеска для губ: Гибрид бальзама и блеска; Кремовый; Глянцевый; Желейный; Лак; Жидкость; Масло; Плампер; Стик; Тинт; Другой
sk-SK: Zloženie lesku na pery: Hybrid balzamu a lesku; Krémová; Lesklý; Želé; Lak; Kvapalina; Olej; Zväčšovač pier; Tyčinka; Tónovač; Iné
cs: Složení lesku na rty: Hybrid balzámu a lesku; Krémový; Lesk; Želé; Lak; Kapalina; Olej; Zvětšovač; Tyčinka; Tint; Jiné
th: สูตรลิปกลอส: บาล์มผสมกลอส; ครีม; วาว; เจลลี่; แล็กเกอร์; แบบเหลว; น้ำมัน; อวบอิ่ม; แท่ง; ทินต์; อื่นๆ
vi: Công thức son bóng: Lai dầu dưỡng-son bóng; Kem; Bóng; Thạch; Sơn mài; Liquid; Dầu; Làm đầy; Nén; Nhuộm; Khác
sl-SI: Formulacija sijaja za ustnice: Hibrid balzam-gloss; Kremna; Sijaj; Žele; Lazura; Tekočina; Olje; Povečevalec; Palica; Tint; Drugo
nb: Leppeglansformulering: Balsam-gloss-hybrid; Krem; Gloss; Gelé; Lakk; Væske; Olje; Volumgiver; Pinne; Tint; Annet
zh-CN: 唇彩配方: 润唇膏混合型; 乳霜; 亮光; 果冻; 漆; 液体; 油; 丰唇型; 棒/棍/签; 染唇液; 其他
da: Lipgloss-formulering: Balsam-gloss-hybrid; Creme; Glans; Gelé; Lak; Væske; Olie; Plumper; Pind; Tint; Andet
sv: Läppglansformulering: Balsam-gloss-hybrid; Kräm; Glans; Gelé; Lack; Vätska; Olja; Plumper; Stift; Tint; Övrigt
fr: Formulation du brillant à lèvres: Hybride baume-gloss; Crème; Brillant; Gelée; Laque; Liquide; Huile; Repulpant; Bâton; Teinte; Autre
el: Σύνθεση γκλος χειλιών: Υβριδικό βάλσαμο-γκλος; Κρέμα; Λάμψη; Ζελέ; Βερνίκι; Υγρό; Έλαιο; Μεγεθυντής; Στικ; Τιντ; Άλλο
pt-PT: Formulação do gloss labial: Híbrido bálsamo-gloss; Creme; Brilhante; Geleia; Laca; Líquido; Óleo; Volumizador; Taco; Tinta; Outro
en: Lip gloss formulation: Balm-gloss hybrid; Creme; Gloss; Jelly; Lacquer; Liquid; Oil; Plumper; Stick; Tint; Other
it: Formulazione del lucidalabbra: Ibrido balsamo-gloss; Crema; Lucido; Gelatina; Lacca; Liquido; Olio; Volumizzante; Stick; Tinta; Altro
de: Lipgloss-Formulierung: Balsam-Gloss-Hybrid; Creme; Glänzend; Gelee; Lack; Flüssig; Öl; Volumengebend; Stick; Tönung; Sonstiges
pl: Formuła błyszczyka do ust: Hybryda balsamu i błyszczyka; Kremowy; Połysk; Żelowy; Lakier; Płyn; Olej; Powiększający; Przypnij; Tint; Inne